Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-6,267
Use of restraint
system or occupant protection system; when; information and education program.

(1) Any person in Nebraska who drives any motor vehicle which has or
is required to have an occupant protection system shall ensure that all children up to six years of age being transported
by such vehicle use a child passenger restraint system of a type which meets
Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 213 as developed by the National Highway
Traffic Safety Administration, as such standard existed on January 1, 2009,
and which is correctly installed in such vehicle.

(2) Any person in Nebraska who drives
any motor vehicle which has or is required to have an occupant protection
system shall ensure that all children six years of age and less
than eighteen years of age being transported by such vehicle use an occupant
protection system.

(3) Subsections (1) and
(2) of this section apply to every motor vehicle which is equipped
with an occupant protection system or is required to be equipped with restraint
systems pursuant to Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 208, as such standard
existed on January 1, 2009, except taxicabs, mopeds, motorcycles, and any
motor vehicle designated by the manufacturer as a 1963 year model or earlier
which is not equipped with an occupant protection system.

(4) Whenever any licensed
physician determines, through accepted medical procedures, that use of a child
passenger restraint system by a particular child would be harmful by reason
of the child's weight, physical condition, or other medical reason, the provisions
of subsection (1) or (2) of
this section shall be waived. The driver of any vehicle transporting such
a child shall carry on his or her person or in the vehicle a signed written
statement of the physician identifying the child and stating the grounds for
such waiver.

(5) The drivers of authorized
emergency vehicles shall not be subject to the requirements of subsection
(1) or (2) of this
section when operating such authorized emergency vehicles pursuant to their
employment.

(6) A driver of a motor vehicle
shall not be subject to the requirements of subsection (1) or (2) of this section if the motor vehicle
is being operated in a parade or exhibition and the parade or exhibition is
being conducted in accordance with applicable state law and local ordinances
and resolutions.

(7) The Department of Roads
shall develop and implement an ongoing statewide public information and education
program regarding the use of child passenger restraint systems and occupant
protection systems and the availability of distribution and discount programs
for child passenger restraint systems.

(8) All persons being transported
by a motor vehicle operated by a holder of a provisional operator's permit
or a school permit shall use such motor vehicle's occupant protection system.

Laws 1983, LB 306, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 259, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 958, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 958, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,103.01;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 363;

Laws 2000, LB 410, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1073, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 227, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB239, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB756, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB219, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB67, § 1.